Utah statutes.
53A-11-106.   Truancy support centers.

(1)  A school district may establish one or more truancy support centers for:

(a)  truant minors taken into custody under Section 53A-11-105; or

(b)  students suspended or expelled from school.

(2)  A truancy support center shall provide services to the truant minor and the truant minor's family, including:

(a)  assessments of the truant minor's needs and abilities;

(b)  support for the parents and truant minor through counseling and community programs; and

(c)  tutoring for the truant minor during the time spent at the center.

(3)  For the suspended or expelled student, the truancy support center shall provide an educational setting, staffed with certified teachers and aides, to provide the student with ongoing educational programming appropriate to the student's grade level.

(4)  In a district with a truancy support center, all students suspended or expelled from school shall be referred to the center.  A parent or guardian shall appear with the student at the center within 48 hours of the suspension or expulsion, not including weekends or holidays.  The student shall register and attend classes at the truancy support center for the duration of the suspension or expulsion unless the parent or guardian demonstrates that alternative arrangements have been made for the education or supervision of the student during the time of suspension or expulsion.

(5)  The truancy support center may provide counseling and other support programming for students suspended or expelled from school and their parents or guardian.

